morph.aff
# example for morphological analysis, stemming and generation
SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0 ed [^e] is:past_1
SFX D   0 d e     is:past_1
SFX D   0 ed [^e] is:past_2
SFX D   0 d e     is:past_2

SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0 s . is:plur

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q   0 s . is:sg_3

SFX T Y 2
SFX T   0 ing [^e] is:pr_part
SFX T   e ing e    is:pr_part
