morph.dic
8
rodent/S        po:n        ts:nom
mouse	po:n	al:mice ts:nom
mice	po:n st:mouse        is:plur
consume/TQD     po:v ts:present
ingest/TQD      po:v ts:present
eat/QT	po:v	al:ate	al:eaten	ts:present
ate	po:v	st:eat	is:past_1
eaten	po:v	st:eat	is:past_2
